Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-1754
Seller; failure to deliver products; contract voidable.

If a seller fails to deliver the equipment, supplies, or products within thirty days of the delivery date stated in the contract, unless such delivery delay is beyond the control of the seller, then at any time prior to delivery or within thirty days after delivery, at the election of the purchaser upon written notice to the seller, the contract shall be voidable by the purchaser and unenforceable by the seller or his or her assignee.

Laws 1979, LB 180, § 54.